src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON dakkárcase
           +Attr:        K-CONS ;
!    +Use/NG+Attr:        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Sg+Nom:        K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Gen:a       K-VOW ;
         +Sg+Acc:av      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ill:ij      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ine:in      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Ela:is      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Com:ijn     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Nom:a       K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Gen:ij      K-CONS ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:ij      NAMÁK ; !
         +Pl+Acc:ijt     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ill:ijda    K-VOW ;
         +Pl+Ine:ijn     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ela:ijs     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Com:ij      K-CONS ;
            +Ess:in      K-CONS ;
         +Sg+Abe:a#da    K-VOW ; !
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:a#dak   K-CONS ; !
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:a#dagi  K-VOW ; !
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:a#dagá  K-VOW ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:a#tagá  K-VOW ; !
         +Pl+Abe:ij#da   K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ij#dak  K-CONS ; !
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ij#dagi K-VOW ; !
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ij#dagá K-VOW ; !
  +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:ij#tagá K-VOW ; !

LEXICON duobbacase
!         +Attr:bba%>        K-VOW ;
        +Sg+Nom:bba%>        K-VOW ;
        +Sg+Gen:ppa%>        K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:ppa%>        K-VOW ;
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:ppa%>        K-VOW ;
! +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ppa%>        NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
        +Sg+Acc:ppa%>v       K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Ill:bba%>j       K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Ine:ppa%>n       K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Ela:ppa%>s       K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Com:ppa%>jn      K-CONS ;
        +Pl+Nom:ppa%>        K-VOW ;
        +Pl+Gen:ppa%>j       K-CONS ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ppa%>j       NAMÁK ; !
        +Pl+Acc:ppa%>jt      K-CONS ;
        +Pl+Ill:ppa%>jda     K-VOW ;
        +Pl+Ine:ppa%>jn      K-CONS ;
        +Pl+Ela:ppa%>js      K-CONS ;
        +Pl+Com:ppa%>j       K-CONS ;
           +Ess:bba%>n       K-CONS ;
        +Sg+Abe:ppa%>#da     K-VOW ;
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dak    K-CONS ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dagi   K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>#dagá   K-VOW ; !
 +Sg+Abe+Err/Orth:ppa%>#tagá  K-VOW ; !
         +Pl+Abe:ppa%>j#da   K-VOW ;
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dak  K-CONS ; !
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dagi K-VOW ; !
  +Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ppa%>j#dagá K-VOW ; !
 +Pl+Abe+Err/Orth:ppa%>j#tagá K-VOW ; !


! Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON reflobl
!The plural
 +Pl+Gen:ietja%>j   PxCiPlstem ;
 +Pl+Acc:ietja%>jd  PxCPlstem ;
 +Pl+Ine:ietja%>jn  PxCPlstem ;
 +Pl+Ela:ietja%>jst PxCPlstem ;
 +Pl+Com:ietja%>jn  PxCPlstem ;


!Singular
!The V/V2 alternation due to 3rd person vocalism
!Pointing directly to 1st and 3rd person sublexica for AG & Ine.
!Pointing to exceptional Pl sublexicon for AG and Ine.
 +Sg+Acc:iehtja%> PxV1 ; !First person 
 +Sg+Gen:iehtja%> PxV1 ; !First person
 +Sg+Acc+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietjama K-VOW ; !err/orth ietjama instead if iehtjama
 +Sg+Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietjama K-VOW ; !err/orth ietjama instead if iehtjama
 +Sg+Acc+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietjama K-VOW ; !err/orth ietjama instead if iehtjama
 +Sg+Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietjama K-VOW ; !err/orth ietjama instead if iehtjama
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Use/NG:ietjam K-CONS ; !Exceptional Sg1
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:ietjam K-CONS ; !Exceptional Sg1


 +Sg+Acc:ietja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Gen:ietja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:iehtja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:iehtja%> PxV23 ; !Second and third person
 +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:iehtja%>s PxCi ; !gives -im and -it instead of-am and -at
 +Sg+Ill:alla%>s PxCi ; ! 
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:iehtja%>s PxC ; ! -iehtjasam and iehtjasat
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:alla%>s PxC ; ! -allasam and allasat
 +Sg+Ine:ietja%>n PxC ;
 +Sg+Ela:ietja%>st PxC ; !
 +Sg+Com:ietja%>jn PxC ;

   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:iehtjame K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxDu2:ietjade  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:iehtjame K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:ietjade  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxDu1:ietjame  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxDu2:iehtjade K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxPl1:ietjame  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:iehtjade K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxDu1:iehtjame K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxDu2:ietjade  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:iehtjame K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:ietjade  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxDu1:ietjame  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxDu2:iehtjade K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxPl1:ietjame  K-VOW ; !variant: -me 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:iehtjade K-VOW ; !variant: -me 


LEXICON PxCiPlstem
 +PxDu1:ma  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu1:me  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu2:da  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu3:ska K-VOW ;
 +PxPl1:ma  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl2:da  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl3:sa  K-VOW ;

LEXICON PxCPlstem
 +PxDu1:imme  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu2:ihtte K-VOW ;
 +PxDu3:iska  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl1:imme  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl2:ihtte K-VOW ;
 +PxPl3:isá   K-VOW ;
 

!LEXICON refloblsg ! what is this lexicon? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Gen+PxSg1:iehtja%>m         NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg1:ietja%>m          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg2:ietja%>t          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>t  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg3:ietja%>s          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxSg3+Err/Orth:iehtja%>s  NAMÁK ;

! +Gen+PxDu1:iehtja%>ma          NAMÁK ; !
! +Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietja%>ma  NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxDu1+Use/NG:iehtja%>me   NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu1+Err/Orth:ietja%>me   NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu2:ietja%>da           NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxDu2+Use/NG:ietja%>de    NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>da  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxDu2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>de  NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me
! +Gen+PxDu3:ietja%>ska          NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxDu3+Err/Orth:iehtja%>ska NAMÁK ;
 
! +Gen+PxPl1:iehtja%>ma        NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxPl1+Use/NG:iehtja%>me        NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietja%>ma         NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxPl1+Err/Orth:ietja%>me         NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>da        NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxPl2+Err/Orth:iehtja%>de        NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl2:ietja%>da         NAMÁK ; 
! +Gen+PxPl2+Use/NG:ietja%>de         NAMÁK ; ! variant: -me 
! +Gen+PxPl3+Err/Orth:iehtja%>sa        NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+PxPl3:ietja%>sa  NAMÁK ;


!LEXICON refloblpl ! what is this lexicon? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jma  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jme  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jda  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jska NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jma  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jda  NAMÁK ;
! +Gen+Use/NG:ietja%>jsa  NAMÁK ;


! Interrogative and relative pronouns
! -----------------------------------

LEXICON oblintercas
          +Sg+Gen:an      K-CONS ;
!   +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
          +Sg+Acc:av      K-CONS ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+Long:avva    K-s-VOW ;   ! betong
          +Sg+Ill:asi     K-s-VOW ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:asás    K-CONS ;   ! dial
   +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:asá     K-s-VOW ;   ! dial
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Ill:asa     K-s-VOW ;   !
     +Sg+Ill+Attr:an      K-CONS ;
     +Sg+Ine+Attr:an      K-CONS ;
          +Sg+Com:ajna    K-s-VOW ;
   +Use/NG+Sg+Com:ajnas   K-CONS ;    ! dial
          +Sg+Par:at      K-CONS ;
          
          +Pl+Nom:a%>     K-s-VOW ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Nom+Long:aha     K-s-VOW ; !
          +Pl+Gen:aj      K-CONS ;
!   +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:j      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
          +Pl+Acc:ajt     K-CONS ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Acc:e%>jt   K-CONS ; 
          +Pl+Ill:ajda    K-s-VOW ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ill:e%>jda  K-s-VOW ;
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ine:ajn     K-s-VOW ; !N&J
          +Pl+Ine+Long:ajna    K-s-VOW ;!Spiik ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Ela:ajs     K-CONS ;
          +Pl+Ela+Long:ajsta   K-VOW ; !Spiik ! 
          +Pl+Com:aj      K-CONS ;
             +Ess:anen    K-CONS ;
      +Use/NG+Ess:anºna   K-s-VOW ; !dial 
      +Use/NG+Ess:anºnas  K-s-VOW ; !dial
      
  !        +Sg+Abe:n#da  K-VOW ; !Must be mandá and this is strange.
   +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:an#dak  K-CONS ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:an#dagi K-VOW ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:an#dagá K-VOW ; ! 
  +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:an#tagá K-VOW ; ! 
  !       +Pl+Abe:jda    K-VOW ; !Must be majdá and this is stange
   +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ajdak   K-CONS ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ajdagi  K-VOW ; ! 
   +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:ajdagá  K-VOW ; ! 
  +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:ajtagá  K-VOW ; ! 


LEXICON oblintercas_guhti
         +Sg+Gen:n      K-CONS ;
!  +Use/NG+Sg+Gen:n      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Sg+Acc:v      K-CONS ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Acc+Long:vva    K-s-VOW ; ! betont
         +Sg+Ill:si     K-s-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:sis    K-CONS ; ! dial
  +Use/NG+Sg+Ill:sá     K-s-VOW ;   ! dial
         +Sg+Com:jna    K-s-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Com:jnas   K-CONS ; ! 
         +Sg+Par:t      K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Gen:j      K-CONS ;
!  +Use/NG+Pl+Gen:j      NAMÁK ; ! why to NAMÁK? adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
         +Pl+Acc:jt     K-CONS ;
         +Pl+Ill:jda    K-s-VOW ;
         +Pl+Ine:jn     K-CONS ; !N&J !gielaj hilá
  +Use/NG+Pl+Ine+Long:jna    K-s-VOW ;!Spiik 
         +Pl+Ela:js     K-CONS ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Ela+Long:jsta   K-VOW ; 
         +Pl+Com:j      K-CONS ;
!        +Sg+Abe:n#da   K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:n#dak  K-CONS ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:n#dagi K-VOW ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Sg+Abe:n#dagá K-VOW ; ! 
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:n#tagá K-VOW ; ! 
 !       +Pl+Abe:jda    K-VOW ;
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:jdak   K-CONS ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:jdagi  K-VOW ; ! 
  +Use/NG+Pl+Abe:jdagá  K-VOW ; ! 
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:jtagá  K-VOW ; ! 

 

!LEXICON idiosyncmij
!        +Nom:a%>     K-s ;
! +Use/NG+Nom:aha     K-s ; ! 
!        +Gen:aj      K ; 
!! +Use/NG+Gen:aj      NAMÁK ; ! adjectival -k derivation does not take pronouns
! +Use/NG+Acc:e%>jt   K ; 
!        +Acc:a%>jt   K ; 
!        +Ill:e%>jda  K-s ;
!!       +Ine:a%>jna  K-s ;
!        +Ine:a%>jn   K ;
!        +Ela:a%>jsta K-s ;
! +Use/NG+Ela:a%>js   K ; ! 
! ! +Abe:ajda  K ;            ! covered in non-idiosync   
!! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jdak  K ;  ! covered in non-idiosync   
!! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jdagi  K ; ! covered in non-idiosync   
!! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jdagá  K ; ! covered in non-idiosync   
!! +Abe+Use/NG:a%>jtagá  K ; ! covered in non-idiosync   
